Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.100

Creation of district—Submittal of question to landowners—Majority vote required—Adoption of ordinance.

If the proposal receives a simple majority vote in favor of creating the lake or beach management district, the county legislative authority shall adopt an ordinance creating the lake or beach management district and may proceed with establishing the special assessments or rates and charges, collecting the special assessments or rates and charges, and performing the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities. If a proposed lake management district includes more than one lake and its adjacent areas, the lake management district may only be established if the proposal receives a simple majority vote in favor of creating it by the voters on each lake and its adjacent areas. The county legislative authority shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in a lake or beach management district indicating that such an ordinance has been adopted within ten days of the adoption of the ordinance.

The ballots shall be available for public inspection after they are counted.

[ 2008 c 301 s 12; 1987 c 432 s 8; 1985 c 398 s 9.]